Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 50

Corrections Cooperative Endeavors and Private Management Act

12-50-101. Title.

This chapter shall be referred to and may be cited as the “Corrections Cooperative Endeavors and Private Management Act”.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 1.

12-50-102. Legislative determination.

The General Assembly finds that adequate and modern prison facilities are essential to the safety and welfare of the people of this state.

It is legislatively determined that adequate and modern prison facilities need to be made available and that a feasible and economic way of financing, constructing, acquiring, and operating prison facilities is by authorizing cooperative endeavors and private management under the authority of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 2.

12-50-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Board of Corrections;

“Bond” or “bonds” means all bonds, notes, certificates, or other instruments or evidences of indebtedness issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to finance prison facilities;

“Correctional services” means the following functions, services, and activities when provided within a prison or otherwise:

The operation of facilities, including management, custody of inmates, and providing security;

Food services, commissary, medical services, transportation, sanitation, or other ancillary services;

Development and implementation assistance for classification, management, information systems, or other information systems or services;

Education, training, and jobs programs; and

Counseling, special treatment programs, or other programs for special needs;

“Department” means the Department of Correction;

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Correction;

“Governing body” means:

The city council or board of directors or comparable body for a city;

The town council or board of directors or comparable body for a town; or

The quorum court for a county;

“Local facilities” means those correctional facilities that are under the jurisdiction of a political subdivision;

“Political subdivision” means a city of any class, a town, or a county;

“Prison”, “facility”, or “prison facility” means any institution operated by or under the authority of the department or a political subdivision, public facilities board, redevelopment district, county sheriff, or chief of police and includes, whether obtained by purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, restoration, improvement, alteration, repair, or other means, any physical betterment or improvement related to the housing of inmates or any preliminary plans, studies, or surveys relative thereto; land or rights to land; and any furnishings, machines, vehicles, apparatus, or equipment for use in connection with any prison facility;

“Prison contractor” or “contractor” means any entity entering a contractual agreement to provide any correctional services to inmates under the custody of the state or a political subdivision, public facilities board, or redevelopment district;

“Private correctional facility” means any prison, facility, or prison facility in which correctional services for inmates are provided by a prison contractor or contractor;

“State” means the State of Arkansas; and

“State facilities” means those correctional facilities that are under the jurisdiction of the department.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 3; 2001, No. 616, § 1.

12-50-104. Construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intent and purposes thereof and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of those purposes.

To this end, it shall not be necessary to comply with general provisions of other laws dealing with public commodities and public facilities, their acquisition, construction, leasing, encumbering, or disposition, if the Board of Corrections and the regional corrections commission shall comply with § 12-50-106.

The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, and thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, or things.

In the event that any city or town, with or without one (1) or more counties, enters into an agreement with the state or with a prison contractor, the chief executive officer of each city or town or his or her designee shall serve on the commission.

In the case of a commission having an even number of parties, the appointed representatives of the parties to the commission shall select an additional person, who is acceptable to all other members of the commission, to serve on the commission.

The members of the commission shall serve terms of three (3) years' duration, shall be eligible for reappointment, and may be removed only for cause by the governing body of the city or town which they represent.

In the event of a vacancy other than by expiration of term, the vacancy shall be filled by the governing body of the political subdivision of the representative unable to complete his or her term.

In any contract for correctional services entered into pursuant to this chapter by a regional corrections commission, the commission members shall submit to the governing body of each political subdivision for approval the following contract terms:

The fee to be paid by each political subdivision;

The minimum financial guarantees of each political subdivision; and

The method of billing.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “county or regional” before “detention facility” in (a)(1); in (a)(2)(B), substituted “The county sheriff's office fund and the transfer of funds under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section are not” for “As an agency fund, the transfer of funds is not”; and, in (a)(3), inserted “actions described in this subsection” following “review”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a).

The ability to comply with applicable court orders and correctional standards.

Contracts awarded under the provisions of this section at a minimum shall comply with the following:

Provide for internal and perimeter security to protect the public, employees, and inmates;

Provide inmates with work or training opportunities while incarcerated. However, the contractor shall not benefit financially from the labor of inmates;

Impose discipline on inmates only in accordance with applicable rules and procedures; and

Provide proper food, clothing, housing, and medical care for inmates.

No contract for correctional services shall be entered into unless the following requirements are met:

The contractor provides audited financial statements for the previous five (5) years, or for each of the years the contractor has been in operation, if fewer than five (5) years and provides other financial information as requested; and

The contractor provides an adequate plan of indemnification, specifically including indemnity for civil rights claims.

The indemnification plan shall be adequate to protect the state, political subdivisions, and public officials, including county sheriffs and chiefs of police, from all claims and losses incurred as a result of the contract.

Nothing in this section is intended to deprive a prison contractor, the state, or a political subdivision of the benefits of any law limiting exposure to liability or setting a limit on damages.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (d), deleted “the provisions of” before “this section” and substituted “annual appropriations” for “biennial appropriations”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

Security employees of a prison contractor shall be allowed to use force and shall be licensed pursuant to the Private Security Agency, Private Investigator, and School Security Licensing and Credentialing Act, § 17-40-101 et seq. The security employees shall exercise their powers and authority only while:

Pursuing escapees from the institution.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 12.

12-50-105. Regional correctional commissions.

Political subdivisions may individually, or in combination with each other, contract with the state through the Division of Correction or with prison contractors for the financing, acquisition, construction, and operation of facilities for the housing of inmates.

(1)In the event two (2) or more counties jointly enter into an agreement with the state or with a prison contractor, they shall form a regional corrections commission, which shall be composed of the county judge of each county or his or her or her designee.

In the case of a commission having an even number of parties, the appointed representatives of the parties to the commission shall select an additional person, who is acceptable to all representatives to the commission, to serve on the commission.

The members of the commission shall serve terms of three (3) years' duration, shall be eligible for reappointment, and may be removed only for cause by the quorum court of the county which they represent.

In the event of a vacancy other than by expiration of term, the vacancy shall be filled by the governing body of the county of the representative unable to complete his or her term.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 840.

12-50-106. Contracts for correctional facilities.

The Division of Correction, any regional corrections commission, and any political subdivision are authorized to enter into contracts with each other and with prison contractors for the financing, acquiring, constructing, and operating of facilities.

Any contract for the financing, acquiring, constructing, or operating of facilities between the division and a prison contractor shall be approved by the Board of Corrections, subject to the advice and consent of the Legislative Council.

Contracts entered into under the terms of this chapter shall be negotiated with the firm found most qualified. However, no contract for correctional services may be entered into unless the private contractor demonstrates that it has:

The qualifications, experience, and management personnel necessary to carry out the terms of the contract;

The financial strength and ability to provide indemnification for liability arising from large prison management projects;

Evidence of past performance of similar contracts; and

Contracts awarded under this section, including contracts for the provision of correctional services or for the lease or use of public lands or buildings for use in the operation of state or local facilities, may be entered into for a period of up to twenty (20) years, subject to the requirement for annual appropriation of funds by each political subdivision and subject to the requirement of annual appropriations by the state.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 5; 2017, No. 250, § 27; 2019, No. 910, § 841.

12-50-107. Authority of security employees — Applicability of criminal laws.

On the grounds of an institution under the supervision of the prison contractor;

Transporting inmates; and

The provisions of §5-54-101 et seq. and §12-29-109 shall apply to offenses committed by or with regard to inmates assigned to facilities or programs for which a prison contractor is providing correctional services.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, §§ 6, 7.

12-50-108. Nondelegable responsibilities.

No contract for correctional services shall authorize, allow, or imply a delegation of authority or responsibility of the Director of the Department of Correction or the county sheriff of any county or the police chief of any city or town to a prison contractor for any of the following:

Developing and implementing procedures for calculating inmate release and parole eligibility dates;

Developing and implementing procedures for calculating and awarding sentence credits;

Approving inmates for furlough and work release;

Approving the type of work inmates may perform and the wages or sentence credits which may be given the inmates engaging in that work; and

Granting, denying, or revoking sentence credits.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 8.

12-50-109. Financing — Contracts with Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

The Board of Corrections and any regional corrections commission may cooperate and contract with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to provide for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, interest on, and trustee's and paying agent's fees in connection with bonds issued to finance the acquisition, construction, and operation of prison facilities authorized under this chapter to be secured by a lien on and pledge of one (1) or more of the following:

All revenues derived from payments to be made by the Division of Correction for the housing of prisoners;

All revenues derived from payments to be made by political subdivisions for the housing of prisoners; or

Any other revenues authorized by the General Assembly or the governing body of any political subdivision.

Any documents relating to a pledge under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall state that the pledge is subject to annual appropriation by the governing body or annual appropriation of the General Assembly, respectively.

It is not necessary to the perfection of the lien and pledge for those purposes that the trustee in connection with the bond issue or the holders of the bonds take possession of the collateral security.

In addition to any other approved method of financing, counties may utilize the provisions of the County Jail Revenue Bond Act of 1981, § 12-41-601 et seq., as a permissible means of financing correctional facilities to be used pursuant to the contracts entered into under the provisions of this chapter.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “may” for “are authorized and empowered to”; in (a)(2)(A), substituted “a pledge under subdivision (a)(1) of this section” for “those pledges” and “annual” for “biennial” preceding “appropriation of the General Assembly”; and, in (a)(2)(B), substituted “It is not” for “It shall not be”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1)(A).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 9; 2017, No. 250, § 28; 2019, No. 910, § 842.

12-50-110. Hiring preference.

State and political subdivision employees whose employment becomes subject to a contract with a private prison contractor shall be given a hiring preference for available positions for which they qualify by the private prison contractor.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 427, § 10.

12-50-111. Private correctional facilities.

No private correctional facility in which inmates committed to the Division of Correction, out-of-state inmates, or federal inmates are to be housed shall be constructed nor shall any facility be renovated for the purpose of creating a private correctional facility in which inmates committed to the division, out-of-state inmates, or federal inmates are to be housed within the state without review and approval by the Board of Corrections and review and approval by the Legislative Council.

Review of requests for construction at a minimum shall include:

Consideration of the location, design, security level, and financing of the facility; and

The nature of the inmates to be housed in the facility.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, no facility located within this state, except a facility operated by the United States Bureau of Prisons, may house out-of-state or federal inmates without approval of the board.

Review of requests to house such inmates may include, among other factors, consideration of the design and security level of the facility and the nature of the inmates to be housed in the facility.

Approval must be obtained at least annually.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, no facility located within this state, except a facility operated by the United States Bureau of Prisons, may house out-of-state or federal inmates unless the board has certified that the state does not need some or all of the capacity of the facility for state inmates.

Such certification shall be obtained at least annually.

The board shall also certify the custody levels of any facility housing out-of-state or federal inmates.

The board, in its discretion, may declare an emergency and waive the provisions of subsection (a) of this section to make use of available space for housing state inmates.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the temporary detention in this state of any out-of-state or federal inmate transported to this state for the purpose of appearing in court or any suspected alien detained by authority of the United States Department of Homeland Security, nor shall subsections (b) and (c) of this section be construed to alter or affect the operation of any interstate compact or agreement between this state or any other state or the federal government regarding the detention and housing of inmates.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (a)(1).

Cross References. Interstate Compacts, §12-49-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 380, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 843.